West Virginia, session 2025, SB321.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 5. Authorization for Department of health to promulgate legislative rules. §64-5-1. Department of Health. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on September 3, 2024, authorized under the authority of §16-1-4 of this code, relating to the Department of Health (fatality and mortality review team, 64 CSR 29), is authorized.